Wyoming, session 2026, HB0023.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 21-4-506(a)(intro) is amended to
read:
21-4-506. Participation in activities by students not
enrolled in the district; limitation on fees.
(a) Any school age child who is a resident of a
school district, who is not under suspension or expulsion
by a Wyoming school district and who is not enrolled as a
full-time student in the district in which he resides,
shall be permitted by the district to participate in any
activities offered by the district, including, but not
limited to, activities which are sanctioned by the Wyoming
high school activities association and which are offered by
the district subject to the following:
Section 2. W.S. 21-4-506(a)(intro) as amended by
section 1 of this act, shall apply school year 2026-2027
and each school year thereafter.
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0023
ENROLLED ACT NO. 17, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
2